Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 7 Home Health Agencies

Administrative rules and regulations.

Home health agencies, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-31.

31-7-150.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Branch office” means a location or site, identified in the application or endorsement thereto, from which a home health agency provides services within a portion of the total geographic area served by the parent agency and which is part of the home health agency and is located sufficiently close to share administration, supervision, and services in a manner that renders it unnecessary for the branch independently to meet the requirements of this article.

(1.1)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Home health agency” means a public, nonprofit, or proprietary organization, whether owned or operated by one or more persons or legal entities, which is engaged in furnishing home health services.

“Home health services” means those items and services furnished to an individual according to a written plan of treatment signed by the patient’s physician, by a home health agency, or by others under arrangement with the home health agency, on a visit or hourly basis, in a place of temporary or permanent residence used as the individual’s home, as follows:

Part-time or intermittent skilled nursing care as ordered by a physician and provided by or under the supervision of a registered nurse and at least one other service listed in subparagraphs (B) through (D) of this paragraph;

Physical, occupational, or speech therapy;

Medical social services; and

Home health aide services.

“License” means a license issued by the department.

“Licensee” means the individual, corporation, or public entity with whom rests the ultimate responsibility for maintaining approved standards for the home health agency.

“Parent home health agency” means the agency that develops and maintains administrative controls of subunits or branch offices.

“Physician” means an individual currently licensed or authorized to practice medicine, surgery, or osteopathy in this state.

“Plan of treatment” means a plan written, signed, and reviewed at least every two months by the patient’s physician prescribing items and services for the patient’s condition.

“Registered nurse” means an individual who is currently licensed as a registered professional nurse in this state.

“Subunit” means a semiautonomous organization which serves patients in a geographic area different from that of the parent agency and which, by virtue of the distance between it and the parent agency, is judged incapable of sharing administration, supervision, and services on a daily basis with the parent agency and must, therefore, independently meet the licensing requirements for a home health agency and shall be separately licensed.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-15/SB 433.

31-7-151.
License required; license may not be transferred but may be suspended or revoked.

No person, private or public organization, political subdivision, or other governmental agency may operate a home health agency as defined in Code Section 31-7-150 without first obtaining a license from the department. A license issued under this article is not assignable or transferable and is subject to suspension or revocation at any time for failure to comply with this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 3.

31-7-152.
Application for license.

Any person, organization, or agency desiring to operate a home health agency shall file with the department an application on a form prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the department. The application shall contain such information as the department may require which is reasonably related to the department’s licensure purpose and function.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 4.

31-7-153.
Standards for patient care and agency operation; regulations as to issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses; hearings.

The department shall promulgate regulations which define standards for the care, treatment, health, safety, welfare, and comfort of patients served by home health agencies and for the maintenance and operation of home health agencies which will promote safe and adequate care and treatment of the patients. These regulations shall be no less stringent than those required for participation of home health agencies in the Title XVIII medicare program and shall include, but not be limited to, a provision requiring the agency to have policies established by a professional group which includes at least one physician and one registered nurse and appropriate representation from other professional disciplines; provisions governing the services the agency provides; provisions for the supervision of services by a physician or registered nurse, as appropriate, and maintenance of clinical records on all patients, including a plan of treatment prescribed by a physician. The department is authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section. Such regulations shall also include hearing procedures related to denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

U.S. Code.

Title XVIII, referred to in this Code section, is Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act and is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 1395

et seq.

31-7-154.
Inspections.

Each home health agency for which a license has been issued shall be periodically inspected by an authorized representative of the department. Such inspections shall be for the purpose of ensuring that this article is being followed. The department is directed to ensure by inspection that the licensee is providing quality care to its patients in accordance with the orders of the patient’s physician; provided, however, that an agency shall be exempt from an additional on-site licensure inspection if certified in a federal program for reimbursement of medicare or Medicaid services.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 6.

31-7-155.
Certificates of need for new service or extending service area; exemption from certificate.

No home health agency initiating service or extending the range of its service area shall be licensed unless the department determines, in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 6 of this title and regulations pursuant thereto, that there is a need for said services within the area to be served. All home health agencies which were delivering services prior to July 1, 1979, and were certified for participation in either Title XVIII or Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act prior to such date shall be exempt from a certificate of need, except in those instances where expansion of services or service areas is requested by such home health agencies. Such exemption from a certificate of need shall extend to all areas in which a home health agency was licensed by the department to provide services on or before December 31, 1989, except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

Concerning an exemption from a certificate of need pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, service areas which were the subject of litigation pending in any court of competent jurisdiction, whether by way of appeal, remand, stay, or otherwise, as of December 31, 1989, shall not be so exempt except as set forth in the final unappealed administrative or judicial decision rendered in such litigation.

Except with respect to a home health agency’s service areas which were the subject of litigation pending in any court of competent jurisdiction as of December 31, 1989, the department shall not consider any request for or issue a determination of an exemption from a certificate of need pursuant to this Code section after December 31, 1989.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 378, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-16/SB 433.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of counties relating to support of paupers, T. 36, C. 12.

U.S. Code.

Titles XVIII and XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, are codified as 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395 et seq. and 1396 et seq., respectively.

31-7-156.
Fee system for services under this article.

The department is authorized to establish by standards and policies a fee system which will be applied to all services under this article in order to defray the actual expenses which are incurred by discharging the obligations of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 9.

31-7-157.
Exemptions from article.

This article shall not apply to services which are provided under the following conditions:

Personal or paraprofessional health services provided either with or without compensation when there is no claim that the service is provided as a part of a licensed home health agency;

Professional services provided by persons who are duly licensed for such services under Georgia laws when there is no claim that the service is provided as a part of a licensed home health agency; or

Services provided under any other license issued by the state when there is no claim that the service is provided as a part of a licensed or certified home health agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 1.

31-7-158.
Penalties for unlicensed operation.

Any person who operates a home health agency without first obtaining a license pursuant to this article shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00 or imprisoned for a period not to exceed six months, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1790, § 7.

31-7-159.
Licensure and regulation of home health agencies transferred to Department of Community Health.

Effective July 1, 2009, all matters relating to the licensure and regulation of home health agencies pursuant to this article shall be transferred from the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) to the Department of Community Health.

The Department of Community Health shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, or scheduled to go into effect on or after July 1, 2009, and which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by the Department of Community Health by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by the Department of Human Resources which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the Department of Community Health. In all such instances, the Department of Community Health shall be substituted for the Department of Human Resources, and the Department of Community Health shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Human Resources in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1, 2009, become employees of the Department of Community Health in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of community health. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the Department of Community Health on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the Department of Community Health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-159

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-17/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-30/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-38/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”